Utah statutes.
13-11-18.   Noncompliance by supplier subject to other state supervision -- Cooperation of enforcing authority and other official or agency.

(1)  If the enforcing authority receives a complaint or other information relating to noncompliance with this act by a supplier who is subject to other supervision in this state, the enforcing authority shall inform the official or agency having that supervision. The enforcing authority may request information about suppliers from the official or agency.

(2)  The enforcing authority and any other official or agency in this state having supervisory authority over a supplier shall consult and assist each other in maintaining compliance with this act. Within the scope of their authority, they may jointly or separately make investigations, prosecute suits, and take other official action they consider appropriate.

